Utah statutes.
63A-1-105.   Appointment of executive director -- Compensation.

(1)  The governor shall:

(a)  appoint the executive director with the consent of the Senate; and

(b)  establish the executive director's salary within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.

(2)  The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

